Massachusetts, session 194th, H510.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The twenty-first paragraph of section 1B of chapter 69 of the General Laws, as appearing
in the 2014 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following sentence:- The
mandatory minimum age for attendance of kindergarten shall be for a child 5 years of age for
attendance in the school year beginning in September of the calendar year in which he or she
attains the age of 5.
of 1